Utah statutes.
61-2a-9.   Division subrogated to judgment creditor -- Authority to revoke
license.
(1)  If the division makes payment from the fund to a judgment creditor, the
division shall be subrogated to the rights of the judgment creditor for the
amounts paid out of the fund and any amount and interest recovered by the
division shall be deposited in the fund.
(2) (a)  The license of a real estate licensee for whom payment from the fund
is made under this chapter shall be automatically revoked.
(b)  A licensee may not apply for a new license until the amount paid out on
the licensee's account, plus interest at a rate determined by the division
with the concurrence of the commission, is repaid in full.
